Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 4
F

ORESTRY RESEARCH

12-6-110. Powers and duties of State Forestry Commission as to forestry research.

The State Forestry Commission shall have the following duties and powers:

To investigate subjects or methods, means, and ways of carrying out such forestry research as it may determine most desirable or necessary in any phase of forestry, or any research which would benefit the promotion of forestry in the State of Georgia, or which would be for the benefit of any industry either privately owned or owned by federal or state governments, or any subdivision thereof;

To promote and assist in the publicizing of the result of any research connected with any phase of forestry. The commission shall cooperate with, and is specifically authorized to counsel and advise, any entity having duties, powers, or objectives similar to or related to those of the commission, including but not limited to any private industry, any agency or agencies of the federal government, this state, other states, and any local governments;

To coordinate all forestry research in the State of Georgia and to see that there is no duplication of research by any agency of the state with any research by the federal government, any county, municipality, or local government, any board, bureau, commission, or any other organization, public or private. The commission shall investigate and determine what forestry research is being carried on by any of the entities listed in this paragraph and shall use the results of this investigation to advise and furnish information to any other entity engaged in forestry research; and

To designate any agency of the state or federal government, or any subdivision thereof, or any other organization which is organized for the purpose of and engaged in forestry research, to carry out any research or experiment in connection with forestry which the commission deems to have the best facilities or to be otherwise best suited for carrying out the particular research or experiment. The commission may, from its funds provided for in this part, allocate to such agency or organization such amount as it deems necessary for such particular research or experiment.

(Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 45, §§ 9, 10; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2056, § 1.)

12-6-111. Employment by State Forestry Commission of assistants and other employees.

The State Forestry Commission shall have the power to employ such assistants, technical, clerical, or otherwise, and such other employees as the commission in the exercise of its discretion shall deem necessary or proper to the effectual discharge of the duties and the exercise of the powers of the commission enumerated in this part. The commission shall have the power to fix, prescribe, and change the compensation and duties of any such employees.

(Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 45, § 8; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2056, § 1.)

12-6-112. Appropriations, grants, or gifts to State Forestry Commission for forestry research.

For carrying out any of the objectives stated in Code Section 12-6-110, the State Forestry Commission may accept appropriations, grants, or gifts from the federal government; the state government; any county, municipal, or local government; any board, bureau, commission, agency, or establishment of any such government; any other organizations, public or private; and any individual or groups of individuals or corporations. Such grants or gifts shall be held and administered subject to this part.

Appropriations for research conducted by or through the State Forestry Commission for the purposes stated in this part shall be specified in the "General Appropriations Act" as a separate line item appropriation under the State Forestry Commission. Any funds in such line item appropriation shall be allocated to research projects selected by the State Forestry Commission and the director of the State Forestry Commission.

(Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 45, § 11; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2056, § 1.)

12-6-113 through 12-6-118.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 4, effective July 1, 2001.

Editor's notes.

- These Code sections, relating to forest resources and other plant life, were based on Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 45,

§§

1-7; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2056,

§

1.